en: Strut placement: Front (both sides); Front left; Front right; Rear (both sides); Rear left; Rear right; Other
ko: 스트럿 장착 위치: 전면(양면); 전면 좌측; 전면 우측; 후면(양쪽); 후면 좌측; 후면 우측; 기타
zh-TW: 支柱放置: 前 (兩側); 左前; 右前; 後方 (兩側); 左後; 右後; 其他
nb: Plassering av stag: Foran (begge sider); Venstre foran; Høyre foran; Bak (begge sider); Bak venstre; Bak høyre; Annet
da: Placering af fjederben: Foran (begge sider); Foran venstre; Foran højre; Bag (begge sider); Bag venstre; Bag højre; Andet
sk-SK: Umiestnenie podpery: Vpredu (obe strany); Vpredu vľavo; Vpredu vpravo; Vzadu (obe strany); Vzadu vľavo; Vzadu vpravo; Iné
it: Posizionamento del montante: Anteriore (entrambi i lati); Anteriore sinistro; Anteriore destro; Posteriore (entrambi i lati); Posteriore sinistro; Posteriore destro; Altro
bg-BG: Разположение на подпората: Отпред (двете страни); Отпред вляво; Отпред вдясно; Отзад (двете страни); Отзад вляво; Отзад вдясно; Друго
zh-CN: 支柱安装位置: 前部（两侧）; 左前; 右前; 后部（两侧）; 左后; 右后; 其他
pt-BR: Posicionamento do amortecedor: Dianteira (ambos os lados); Dianteira esquerda; Dianteira direita; Traseiro (ambos os lados); Traseiro esquerdo; Traseiro direito; Outro
nl: Plaatsing van veerpoot: Voor (beide zijden); Voor links; Voor rechts; Achter (beide kanten); Linksachter; Rechtsachter; Overig
hr-HR: Položaj podupirača: Sprijeda (obje strane); Prednja lijeva; Prednja desna; Straga (obje strane); Stražnja lijeva; Stražnja desna; Ostalo
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งโช้คอัพสตรัท: หน้า (ทั้งสองข้าง); หน้าซ้าย; หน้าขวา; ด้านหลัง (ทั้งสองข้าง); หลังซ้าย; หลังขวา; อื่นๆ
tr: Amortisör yerleşimi: Ön (her iki taraf); Ön sol; Ön sağ; Arka (her iki taraf); Arka sol; Arka sağ; Diğer
pl: Położenie rozpórek: Przód (obie strony); Przód, z lewej; Przód, z prawej; Tył (obie strony); Tył, z lewej; Tył, z prawej; Inne
fr: Emplacement des entretoises: Avant (des deux côtés); Avant gauche; Avant droit; Arrière (les deux côtés); Arrière gauche; Arrière droit; Autre
hu: Támasztó elhelyezése: Első (mindkét oldal); Bal első; Jobb első; Hátsó (mindkét oldal); Bal hátsó; Jobb hátsó; Egyéb
ru: Расположение стойки: Спереди (обе стороны); Спереди слева; Спереди справа; Сзади (с обеих сторон); Сзади слева; Сзади справа; Другое
el: Τοποθέτηση αντηρίδας: Εμπρός (και στις δύο πλευρές); Εμπρός αριστερά; Εμπρός δεξιά; Πίσω (και στις δύο πλευρές); Πίσω αριστερά; Πίσω δεξιά; Άλλο
ja: ストラット配置: フロント (両側); フロント左; フロント右; リア (両側); リア左; リア右; その他
pt-PT: Localização do amortecedor: Frente (ambos os lados); Frente esquerda; Frente direita; Traseira (ambos os lados); Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Outro
sl-SI: Namestitev vzmetne noge: Spredaj (obe strani); Spredaj levo; Spredaj desno; Zadaj (obe strani); Zadaj levo; Zadaj desno; Drugo
ro-RO: Amplasare a barei de rigidizare: Față (ambele părți); Față stânga; Față dreapta; Spate (ambele părți); Spate stânga; Spate dreapta; Altele
de: Position der Verstrebung: Vorne (beide Seiten); Vorne links; Vorne rechts; Hinten (beide Seiten); Hinten links; Hinten rechts; Andere
es: Ubicación del puntal: Delantero (ambos lados); Delantero izquierdo; Delantero derecho; Trasero (ambos lados); Trasero izquierdo; Trasero derecho; Otro
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt phuộc nhún: Phía trước (cả hai bên); Trước bên trái; Trước bên phải; Phía sau (cả hai bên); Phía sau bên trái; Phía sau bên phải; Khác
cs: Umístění vzpěry: Vpředu (obě strany); Vpředu vlevo; Vpředu vpravo; Vzadu (obě strany); Vzadu vlevo; Vzadu vpravo; Jiné
sv: Placering av stag: Fram (båda sidor); Fram till vänster; Fram till höger; Bak (båda sidor); Bak vänster; Bak höger; Övrigt
fi: Joustintuen paikka: Edessä (molemmat puolet); Edessä vasemmalla; Edessä oikealla; Taka (molemmat puolet); Takavasen; Takaoikea; Muu
lt-LT: Atramų išdėstymas: Priekyje (abiejose pusėse); Priekyje kairėje; Priekyje dešinėje; Gale (abiejose pusėse); Gale kairėje; Gale dešinėje; Kita